Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-1307
Recall election; ballot.

The form of the official ballot at a recall election held pursuant to section 32-1306 shall conform to the requirements of this section. With respect to each person whose removal is sought, the question shall be submitted: Shall (name of person) be removed from the office of (name of office)? Immediately following each such question there shall be printed on the ballot the two responses: Yes and No. Next to each response shall be placed a square or oval in which the registered voters may vote for one of the responses by making a cross or other clear, identifiable mark. The name of the official which shall appear on the ballot shall be the name of the official that appeared on the ballot of the previous general election that included his or her name.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 380;

Laws 2003, LB 358, § 43.